bg-BG: Тип билет: Общ прием; Премиум места; Запазени места; Правостоящи; Други
cs: Typ lístku: Všeobecný vstup; Prémiové sezení; Vyhrazené sezení; Prostor k stání; Jiné
vi: Loại vé: Hạng vé phổ thông; Hạng vé phổ thông đặc biệt; Chỗ đã đăng ký; Chỗ đứng; Khác
tr: Bilet türü: Genel kabul; Premium oturma alanı; Rezerve koltuklar; Ayakta durulacak yerler; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de bilhete: Admissão geral; Assentos premium; Assentos reservados; Sala de espera; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta ulaznice: Opći ulaz; Vrhunska sjedala; Rezervirana mjesta; Prostor za stajanje; Ostalo
zh-TW: 票證類型: 普通入場; 高級座位; 預留座位; 站立空間; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de bilhete: Acesso geral; Assentos premium; Assentos reservados; Sala com lugares em pé; Outro
sv: Biljetttyp: Allmänt insläpp; Premiumsittplatser; Reserverade sittplatser; Stående rum; Övrigt
da: Billettype: Generel optagelse; Premium siddepladser; Reserverede siddepladser; Ståplads; Andet
fr: Type de billet: Admission générale; Sièges haut de gamme; Siège réservé; Salle debout; Autre
it: Tipo di biglietto: Ingresso generale; Posti a sedere di prima qualità; Posti a sedere riservati; Posto in piedi; Altro
ja: チケットの種類: 一般入場; プレミアムシート; 指定席; 立ち見席; その他
es: Tipo de billete: Admisión general; Asientos prémium; Asientos reservados; De pie; Otros
sk-SK: Typ lístka: Všeobecná vstupenka; Prémiové sedenie; Rezervované sedenie; Izba na státie; Iné
ro-RO: Tip bilet: Intrare liberă; Locuri premium; Locuri rezervate; Locuri în picioare; Altele
zh-CN: 票种: 普通入场; 高级座位; 预留座位; 站立空间; 其他
fi: Lipputyyppi: Yleinen sisäänpääsy; Premium-istuimet; Varattu istumapaikka; Seisomapaikka; Muu
el: Τύπος εισιτηρίου: Γενική είσοδος; Premium καθίσματα; Κράτηση θέσεων; Όρθιο δωμάτιο; Άλλο
ko: 티켓 종류: 일반 입장; 프리미엄 좌석; 지정석; 스탠딩 룸; 기타
lt-LT: Bilieto tipas: Bendrasis bilietas; „Premium“ vietos; Rezervuotos vietos; Stovimas sektorius; Kita
th: ประเภทตั๋ว: ตั๋วแบบไม่กำหนดที่นั่ง; ที่นั่งแบบพรีเมี่ยม; ที่นั่งสำรอง; พื้นที่สำหรับยืน; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип билета: Общий допуск; Премиум-места; Зарезервированные места; Стоячие места; Другой
nl: Type ticket: Algemene toelating; Premium zitplaatsen; Gereserveerde zitplaatsen; Staande kamer; Andere
hu: Jegy típusa: Általános belépő; Prémium ülőhely; Fenntartott ülőhely; Állószoba; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta vstopnice: Splošna vstopnica; Premium sedeži; Rezervirani sedeži; Stojišče; Drugo
nb: Billetttype: Generelt opptak; Premium sitteplasser; Reserverte sitteplasser; Ståplasser; Annet
pl: Typ biletu: Wstęp ogólny; Miejsca premium; Zarezerwowane miejsca; Przestrzeń stojąca; Inne
de: Art des Tickets: Allgemeiner Einlass; Premium-Sitzplätze; Reservierte Plätze; Stehplatz; Sonstiges
en: Ticket type: General admission; Premium seating; Reserved seating; Standing room; Other